Hawaii statutes.
§441-39 Principal of fund or trusts; use of
income, reserves. (a) The principal of the perpetual care fund shall be
invested and in no event reduced. Only so much of the income of the fund shall
be paid to the cemetery authority as it, by submission of vouchers, can
reasonably show to be necessary to cover the cost of perpetual care of the
cemetery, including reasonable administrative expenses incurred in connection
therewith; provided that a reserve may be created from which principal losses
may be replaced by setting aside a reasonable percentage of surplus income, if
any, or net capital gains from investments, and a reserve may also be set aside
out of surplus income or net capital gains for future maintenance, repair, or
restoration of property or embellishments in the cemetery, which may be
necessary or desirable as a result of wear, deterioration, accident, damage, or
destruction. "Net capital gains" means the amount by which the
cumulative capital gains since the establishment of the perpetual care fund
exceeds the sum of cumulative capital losses since the establishment of the
fund. Any surplus income or net capital gains not so set aside in reserve
shall become a part of the principal of the fund.

(b) The principal of the pre-need trust shall
be invested and shall not be diminished or withdrawn except in payment of the
pre-need interment or pre-need funeral services contracted for and provided to
the deceased purchaser or designee or for the contractual refund to the
purchaser. The cemetery or pre-need funeral authority shall submit to the
trustee a certified statement that the purchaser or an assignee of the
purchaser has received the pre-need services under contract with the authority
in order for the principal to be withdrawn. In the case of refund to the
purchaser, the authority shall submit to the trustee a certified statement that
the purchaser desires a refund. A reserve may be created from which principal
losses may be replaced by setting aside a reasonable percentage of surplus income,
if any, or net capital gains from investments. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS
§441-39; am L 1985, c 101, §19]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next